Ohio, session 136, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3332.031, 3333.046, 4709.05, and 8
4713.07 be amended and section 3314.033 of the Revised Code be 9
enacted to read as follows: 10
Sec. 3314.033. The department of education and workforce 11
shall adopt rules requiring any community school with a for- 12
profit operator to disclose on the school's official web site, 13
all promotional digital and print media, and contracts for 14
instruction, the fact that the community school's operator is a 15
for-profit business. The disclosure shall be made in a type size 16
as large or larger than any other text on the school's official 17
web site, promotional digital and print media, and contract for 18
instruction, excluding the name of the school, and shall be 19

S. B. No. 47 Page 2
As Introduced
presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw the 20
attention of the reader. The disclosure shall read as follows: 21
"(Name of Community School Operator) IS A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN 22
THE STATE OF OHIO." 23
The department shall adopt rules requiring promotional 24
digital and print media for any community school with a for- 25
profit operator that is published by any person or entity not 26
affiliated with the community school to include the disclosure: 27
"A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF OHIO." The disclosure 28
shall be made in a type size as large or larger than any other 29
text in the advertisement. 30
Sec. 3332.031. The state board of career colleges and 31
schools shall: 32
(A) Adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code 33
necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under 34
this chapter; 35
(B) Establish minimum standards for the registration and 36
operation of private career schools including but not 37
necessarily limited to standards to ensure school financial 38
stability; 39
(C) Issue certificates of registration to private career 40
schools pursuant to division (A) of section 3332.05 of the 41
Revised Code; 42
(D) Suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of 43
schools pursuant to sections 3332.09 and 3332.091 of the Revised 44
Code; 45
(E) Establish minimum standards for certificate, diploma, 46
and degree programs offered by schools; 47

S. B. No. 47 Page 3
As Introduced
(F) Issue program authorization pursuant to divisions (B) 48
and (C) of section 3332.05 of the Revised Code; 49
(G) Suspend or revoke program authorization for schools 50
pursuant to sections 3332.09 and 3332.091 of the Revised Code; 51
(H) Establish minimum standards, including but not 52
necessarily limited to a code of ethics, for agents employed by 53
schools registered under this chapter to reasonably ensure that 54
such agents provide adequate, ethical, and accurate information 55
to prospective students; 56
(I) Grant permits to agents pursuant to sections 3332.10 57
and 3332.11 of the Revised Code; 58
(J) Suspend or revoke an agent's permit pursuant to 59
section 3123.47 or 3332.12 of the Revised Code; 60
(K) Monitor recruitment and admissions practices of 61
schools holding certificates of registration to ensure 62
compliance with this chapter and the rules of the board; 63
(L)(1) Adopt rules requiring all schools to provide all 64
applicant students, prior to their signing enrollment 65
agreements, written information concerning the school's 66
graduation and placement rates for each of the preceding three 67
years and any other information the board deems pertinent. 68
(2) Adopt rules requiring all schools to provide any 69
student or applicant student, prior to the signing of any 70
financial aid, grant, or loan application, written information 71
concerning the obligations of a student obtaining such financial 72
aid, grant, or loan. 73
(3) Upon request, a school shall furnish the board with a 74
copy of all information required by this division. The board 75

S. B. No. 47 Page 4
As Introduced
shall monitor schools to ensure their compliance with this 76
division. 77
(M) Adopt a rule requiring all schools to include, in the 78
enrollment agreement, notice that any problems the student is 79
having with the school, or complaints the student has about the 80
school, may be directed to the board, which notice shall include 81
the telephone number of the executive director of the board; 82
(N) Report annually to the governor and the general 83
assembly on the activities of the board and private career 84
schools, and make legislative recommendations when necessary to 85
enable the board to better serve the student population and the 86
schools registered under this chapter; 87
(O) Adopt a rule requiring a uniform tuition refund policy 88
for all schools subject to this chapter. In adopting the rule, 89
the board shall consider the tuition refund policies effectuated 90
by state-supported colleges and universities. Each school 91
subject to this chapter shall furnish to each prospective 92
student, prior to the signing of an enrollment agreement, a copy 93
of the tuition refund policy. 94
(P) Adopt a rule establishing minimum standards for all 95
faculty and instructional staff in all instructional programs at 96
a school. In the case of full-time faculty members employed for 97
degree programs, such standards shall include all of the 98
following: 99
(1) A prohibition against employing on or after July 1, 100
1993, any new full-time faculty member to teach the general 101
study portion of any degree program, unless the person holds a 102
master's degree in the subject matter discipline or holds a 103
master's degree in education with proficiency in the subject 104

S. B. No. 47 Page 5
As Introduced
matter discipline demonstrated in accordance with the standards 105
adopted by the board. 106
(2) Except as provided under the standards adopted 107
pursuant to division (P)(3) of this section, a prohibition 108
against employing or reemploying on or after July 1, 1998, any 109
full-time faculty member to teach the general study portion of 110
any degree program, unless the person holds a master's degree in 111
the subject matter discipline or holds a master's degree in 112
education with proficiency in the subject matter discipline 113
demonstrated in accordance with the standards adopted by the 114
board. 115
(3) Standards under which the board, upon written request 116
submitted to the board prior to July 1, 1994, by any school, may 117
exempt the school from the prohibition adopted pursuant to 118
division (P)(2) of this section with regard to any individual 119
full-time faculty member employed by the school who has 120
demonstrated outstanding teaching performance in the general 121
study portion of any degree program at the school for a period 122
of at least six years prior to July 1, 1993. 123
(4) Definitions of "full-time faculty member," "new 124
faculty member," and any other term the board considers 125
necessary to define. 126
(Q) Adopt a rule prohibiting a school or branch campus 127
thereof from claiming accreditation from an accrediting agency 128
in any of its advertising, recruiting, or promotional materials 129
unless the agency is recognized as an accrediting agency by the 130
United States department of education. 131
(R)(1) Adopt rules requiring any for-profit, post- 132
secondary educational institution registered under section 133

S. B. No. 47 Page 6
As Introduced
3332.05 of the Revised Code to disclose on the institution's 134
official web site, all promotional digital and print media, and 135
contracts for instruction, the fact that the institution is a 136
for-profit business. The disclosure shall be made in a type size 137
as large or larger than any other text on the institution's 138
official web site, promotional digital and print media, and 139
contract for instruction, excluding the name of the institution, 140
and shall be presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw 141
the attention of the reader. The disclosure shall read as 142
follows: "(Name of Degree-Granting Institution) IS A FOR-PROFIT 143
BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF OHIO." 144
(2) Adopt rules requiring promotional digital and print 145
media for any for-profit private college or university, 146
seminary, religious institution, or any other institution 147
registered under section 3332.05 of the Revised Code, published 148
by any person or entity that is not affiliated with the 149
institution, to include the disclosure: "A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS 150
IN THE STATE OF OHIO." The disclosure required under this 151
division shall be made in a type size as large or larger than 152
any other text in the advertisement. 153
Sec. 3333.046. (A) Any institution authorized to grant on 154
February 20, 2002, baccalaureate or master's degrees, for which 155
certificates of authorization have been issued under Chapter 156
1713. of the Revised Code; that is accredited by the appropriate 157
regional and, when appropriate, professional accrediting 158
associations within whose jurisdiction it falls; and that is 159
operated by a for-profit corporation shall cease to be subject 160
to any regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code but 161
shall continue to be subject to the provisions for approval of 162
degree programs set forth in Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, 163
including approval of any additional associate, baccalaureate, 164

S. B. No. 47 Page 7
As Introduced
or master's degree programs offered by the institution. 165
(B)(1) Any institution to which division (A) of this 166
section applies shall disclose on the institution's official web 167
site, all promotional digital and print media, and contracts for 168
instruction, the fact that the institution is a for-profit 169
business. The disclosure shall be made in a type size as large 170
or larger than any other text on the institution's official web 171
site, promotional digital and print media, and contract for 172
instruction, excluding the name of the institution, and shall be 173
presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw the 174
attention of the reader. The disclosure shall read as follows: 175
"(Name of Degree Granting Institution) IS A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS 176
IN THE STATE OF OHIO." 177
(2) All promotional digital and print media for any 178
institution under division (A) of this section, published by any 179
person or entity that is not affiliated with the institution, 180
shall include the disclosure: "A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN THE 181
STATE OF OHIO." The disclosure required under this division 182
shall be made in a type size as large or larger than any other 183
text in the advertisement. 184
Sec. 4709.05. (A) In addition to any other duty imposed on 185
the state cosmetology and barber board under this chapter or 186
Chapter 4713. of the Revised Code, the board shall do all of the 187
following: 188
(1) Regulate the practice of barbering in this state; 189
(2) Conduct or have conducted the examination for 190
applicants to practice as licensed barbers; 191
(3) Prescribe and make available application forms to be 192
used by individuals seeking admission to an examination 193

S. B. No. 47 Page 8
As Introduced
conducted under section 4709.07 of the Revised Code or a license 194
or permit issued under this chapter; 195
(4) Prescribe and make available application forms to be 196
used by individuals seeking renewal of a license or permit 197
issued under this chapter; 198
(5) Furnish a copy of the infection control standards 199
adopted pursuant to division (A)(8)(a) of this section to both 200
of the following: 201
(a) Each individual or person to whom the board issues a 202
barber license or license to operate a barber shop; 203
(b) Each individual providing cosmetic therapy, massage 204
therapy, or other professional service in a barber shop under 205
section 4709.091 of the Revised Code. 206
(6) Supply a copy of the poster created pursuant to 207
division (B) of section 5502.63 of the Revised Code to each 208
person authorized to operate a barber shop under this chapter; 209
(7) Comply with sections 4713.641 and 4713.66 of the 210
Revised Code regarding investigations and inspections; 211
(8) Adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 212
Revised Code, to administer and enforce this chapter and that 213
cover all of the following: 214
(a) Infection control standards for the practice of 215
barbering and the operation of barber shops; 216
(b) The content of the examination required of an 217
applicant for a barber license under section 4709.07 of the 218
Revised Code and the passing score required for the examination; 219
(c) Conditions an individual must satisfy to qualify for a 220

S. B. No. 47 Page 9
As Introduced
temporary pre-examination work permit under section 4709.071 of 221
the Revised Code and the conditions and method of renewing a 222
temporary pre-examination work permit under that section; 223
(d) Requirements for the licensure of barber instructors 224
and assistant barber instructors that are in addition to the 225
requirements specified in section 4709.072 of the Revised Code; 226
(e) Conditions under which the board will take into 227
account, under section 4709.073 of the Revised Code, instruction 228
an applicant for a license under section 4709.07 or 4709.072 of 229
the Revised Code received more than five years before the date 230
of application for the license; 231
(f) Conditions an applicant must satisfy for the board to 232
issue the applicant a license under section 4709.08 of the 233
Revised Code without the applicant taking an examination 234
conducted under section 4709.07 of the Revised Code; 235
(g) Conditions an applicant must satisfy for the board to 236
issue the applicant an independent contractor license under 237
section 4709.09 of the Revised Code and the fee for the issuance 238
and renewal of the license; 239
(h) Specify which professions regulated by a professional 240
regulatory board of this state may be practiced in a barber shop 241
under section 4709.091 of the Revised Code, including whether 242
cosmetic therapy may be practiced in a barber shop; 243
(i) Establish standards for the provision of cosmetic 244
therapy, massage therapy, or other professional service in a 245
barber shop pursuant to section 4709.091 of the Revised Code; 246
(j) If the board, under section 4709.111 of the Revised 247
Code, develops a procedure for classifying licenses inactive, do 248
both of the following: 249

S. B. No. 47 Page 10
As Introduced
(i) Establish a fee for having a license classified 250
inactive that reflects the cost to the board of providing the 251
inactive license service; 252
(ii) Specify the continuing education that an individual 253
whose license has been classified inactive must complete to have 254
the license restored. 255
(k) Require any for-profit barber school operated by a 256
person licensed under section 4709.10 of the Revised Code to 257
disclose on the school's official web site, all promotional 258
digital and print media, and contracts for instruction, the fact 259
that the school is a for-profit business. The disclosure shall 260
be made in a type size as large or larger than any other text on 261
the school's official web site, promotional digital and print 262
media, and contract for instruction, excluding the name of the 263
school, and shall be presented in a manner reasonably calculated 264
to draw the attention of the reader. The disclosure shall read 265
as follows: "(Name of Barber School) IS A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN 266
THE STATE OF OHIO." 267
(l) Require promotional digital and print media for any 268
for-profit barber school or any other institution operated by a 269
person licensed under section 4709.10 of the Revised Code, 270
published by any person or entity that is not affiliated with 271
the school or institution, to include the disclosure: "A FOR- 272
PROFIT BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF OHIO." The disclosure required 273
under this division shall be made in a type size as large or 274
larger than any other text in the advertisement. 275
(m) Any other area the board determines appropriate to 276
administer or enforce this chapter. 277
(B) The infection control standards established under 278

S. B. No. 47 Page 11
As Introduced
division (A)(8)(a) of this section shall focus in particular on 279
precautions to be employed to prevent infectious or contagious 280
diseases being created or spread. 281
(C) The content of the examination specified in rules 282
adopted under division (A)(8)(b) of this section shall include a 283
practical demonstration and a written test, shall relate only to 284
the practice of barbering, and shall require the applicant to 285
demonstrate that the applicant has a thorough knowledge of and 286
competence in the proper techniques in the safe use of chemicals 287
used in the practice of barbering. The minimum passing score of 288
the examination shall not exceed seventy-five per cent. 289
(D) The rules adopted under division (A)(8)(c) of this 290
section may establish additional conditions for a temporary pre- 291
examination work permit under section 4709.071 of the Revised 292
Code that are applicable to individuals who are licensed to 293
practice barbering in another state or country. 294
(E) The conditions specified in rules adopted under 295
division (A)(8)(f) of this section may include that an applicant 296
is applying for a barber license for which the board determines 297
an examination is unnecessary. 298
(F) The rules adopted under division (A)(8)(h) of this 299
section shall not include a profession if practice of the 300
profession in a barber shop is a violation of a statute or rule 301
governing the profession. 302
(G) If the board adopts a procedure for classifying 303
licenses inactive, the continuing education specified under 304
division (A)(8)(j)(ii) of this section shall be sufficient to 305
ensure the minimum competency in the use or administration of a 306
new procedure or product required by a licensee necessary to 307

S. B. No. 47 Page 12
As Introduced
protect public health and safety. The requirement shall not 308
exceed the cumulative number of hours of continuing education 309
that the individual would have been required to complete had the 310
individual retained an active license. 311
Sec. 4713.07. (A) The state cosmetology and barber board 312
shall do all of the following: 313
(1) Regulate the practice of cosmetology and all of its 314
branches in this state; 315
(2) Investigate or inspect, when evidence appears to 316
demonstrate that an individual has violated any provision of 317
this chapter or Chapter 4709. of the Revised Code or any rule 318
adopted under either chapter, the activities or premises of a 319
license holder or unlicensed individual; 320
(3) Adopt rules in accordance with section 4713.08 of the 321
Revised Code; 322
(4) Prescribe and make available application forms to be 323
used by individuals seeking admission to an examination 324
conducted under section 4713.24 of the Revised Code or a license 325
or registration issued under this chapter; 326
(5) Prescribe and make available application forms to be 327
used by individuals seeking renewal of a license or registration 328
issued under this chapter; 329
(6) Provide a toll-free number and an online service to 330
receive complaints alleging violations of this chapter or 331
Chapter 4709. of the Revised Code; 332
(7) Submit a written report annually to the governor that 333
provides all of the following: 334
(a) A discussion of the conditions in this state of the 335

S. B. No. 47 Page 13
As Introduced
practice of barbering, cosmetology, and the branches of 336
cosmetology; 337
(b) An evaluation of board activities intended to aid or 338
protect consumers; 339
(c) A brief summary of the board's proceedings during the 340
year the report covers; 341
(d) A statement of all money that the board received and 342
expended during the year the report covers. 343
(8) Keep a record of all of the following: 344
(a) The board's proceedings; 345
(b) The name and last known physical address, electronic 346
mail address, and telephone number of each individual issued a 347
license or registration under this chapter or Chapter 4709. of 348
the Revised Code; 349
(c) The date and number of each license, permit, and 350
registration that the board issues. 351
(9) Assist ex-offenders and military veterans who hold 352
licenses issued by the board to find employment within salons, 353
barber shops, or other facilities within this state; 354
(10) Require inspectors appointed pursuant to section 355
4713.06 of the Revised Code to conduct inspections of licensed 356
or permitted facilities, including salons and boutique salons, 357
schools, barber shops, and tanning facilities, within ninety 358
days of the opening for business of a licensed facility, upon 359
complaints reported to the board, within ninety days after a 360
violation was documented at a facility, and at least once every 361
two years. Any individual, after providing the individual's name 362
and contact information, may report to the board any information 363

S. B. No. 47 Page 14
As Introduced
the individual may have that appears to show a violation of any 364
provision of this chapter or rule adopted under it or a 365
violation of any provision of Chapter 4709. of the Revised Code 366
or rule adopted by the board pursuant to Chapter 4709. of the 367
Revised Code. In the absence of bad faith, any individual who 368
reports information of that nature or who testifies before the 369
board in any adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the 370
Revised Code shall not be liable for damages in a civil action 371
as a result of the report or testimony. For the purpose of 372
inspections, an independent contractor licensed under this 373
chapter or Chapter 4709. of the Revised Code shall be added to 374
the board's records as an individual salon or barber shop. 375
(11) Supply a copy of the poster created pursuant to 376
division (B) of section 5502.63 of the Revised Code to each 377
person authorized to operate a salon, school, tanning facility, 378
or other type of facility under this chapter; 379
(12) Adopt rules requiring any for-profit school of 380
cosmetology operated by a person licensed under section 4713.44 381
of the Revised Code to disclose on the school's official web 382
site, all promotional digital and print media, and contracts for 383
instruction, the fact that the school is a for-profit business. 384
The disclosure shall be made in a type size as large or larger 385
than any other text on the school's official web site, 386
promotional digital and print media, and contract for 387
instruction, excluding the name of the school, and shall be 388
presented in a manner reasonably calculated to draw the 389
attention of the reader. The disclosure shall read as follows: 390
"(Name of school) IS A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF 391
OHIO." 392
(13) Adopt rules requiring promotional digital and print 393

S. B. No. 47 Page 15
As Introduced
media for any for-profit school of cosmetology or any other 394
institution operated by a person licensed under section 4713.44 395
of the Revised Code, published by any person or entity that is 396
not affiliated with the school or institution, to include the 397
disclosure: "A FOR-PROFIT BUSINESS IN THE STATE OF OHIO." The 398
disclosure required under this division shall be made in a type 399
size as large or larger than any other text in the 400
advertisement. 401
(14) All other duties that this chapter imposes on the 402
board. 403
(B) The board may do either of the following: 404
(1) Report to the proper prosecuting officer violations of 405
section 4709.02 or 4713.14 of the Revised Code; 406
(2) Delegate any of the duties listed in division (A) of 407
this section to the executive director of the board or to an 408
individual designated by the executive director. 409
Section 2. That existing sections 3332.031, 3333.046, 410
4709.05, and 4713.07 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 411